District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.21

Procedure for judicial dissolution.

(a)

It shall not be necessary to make shareholders parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief is sought against them individually.

(b)

The Superior Court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

(c)

Within 10 days of the commencement of a proceeding to dissolve a corporation under § 29-312.20(a)(2), the corporation shall send to all shareholders, other than the petitioner, a notice stating that the shareholders are entitled to avoid the dissolution of the corporation by electing to purchase the petitioner’s shares under § 29-312.24 and accompanied by a copy of § 29-312.24.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720